Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.92, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. All-terrain vehicle or vehicle. (a) "All-terrain vehicle" or "vehicle" means a motorized vehicle with: (1) not less than three, but not more than six deleted text begin low pressure or non-pneumaticdeleted text end tires; (2) a total dry weight of deleted text begin 2,000deleted text end new text begin 3,500 new text end pounds or less; and (3) a total width from outside of tire rim to outside of tire rim that is 65 inches or less. All-terrain vehicle includes a class 1 all-terrain vehicle and class 2 all-terrain vehicle. (b) All-terrain vehicle does not include an electric-assisted bicycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 27, golf cart, mini-truck, dune buggy, or go-cart or a vehicle designed and used specifically for lawn maintenance, agriculture, logging, or mining purposes. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.9275, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pass required; fee. (a) A Tribal member exempt from registration under section 84.922, subdivision 1a, clause (2), or a nonresident may not operate an all-terrain vehicle on a state or grant-in-aid all-terrain vehicle trail unless the operator carries a valid nonresident all-terrain vehicle state trail pass in immediate possession. The pass must be available for inspection by a peace officer, a conservation officer, or an employee designated under section 84.0835. (b) The commissioner of natural resources shall issue a pass upon application and payment of a deleted text begin $30deleted text end new text begin $50new text end fee. The pass is valid from January 1 through December 31. Fees collected under this section, except for the issuing fee for licensing agents, shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund and, except for the electronic licensing system commission established by the commissioner under section 84.027, subdivision 15, must be used for grants-in-aid to counties and municipalities for all-terrain vehicle organizations to construct and maintain all-terrain vehicle trails and use areas. (c) A nonresident all-terrain vehicle state trail pass is not required for: (1) an all-terrain vehicle that is owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision thereof that is exempt from registration under section 84.922, subdivision 1a; (2) a person operating an all-terrain vehicle only on the portion of a trail that is owned by the person or the person's spouse, child, or parent; or (3) a nonresident operating an all-terrain vehicle that is registered according to section 84.922.